Utah statutes.
9-4-629.   Public body may provide financial aid.

In addition to other aids provided, any public body may provide financial aid to a housing authority by loan, donation, grant, contribution, and appropriation of money, by abatement or remission of taxes, by payments in lieu of taxes, by other charges, or by any other means.

